North Carolina statutes. Constitution of North Carolina
Article XI Punishments, Corrections, and Charities

§ 1. Punishments.

The following punishments only shall be known to the laws of this State: death, imprisonment, fines, suspension of a jail or prison term with or without conditions, restitution, community service, restraints on liberty, work programs, removal from office, and disqualification to hold and enjoy any office of honor, trust, or profit under this State.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1; 1995, c. 429, s. 2.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of the first sentence of Art. XI, § 1, Const. 1868, as amended by the Convention of 1875.

§ 2. Death punishment.

The object of punishments being not only to satisfy justice, but also to reform the offender and thus prevent crime, murder, arson, burglary, and rape, and these only, may be punishable with death, if the General Assembly shall so enact.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to punishment for murder, see

G.S. 14-17

.

As to punishment for rape, see

G.S. 14-27.21

and 14-27.22.

As to punishment for burglary, see

G.S. 14-52

.

As to punishment for arson, see

G.S. 14-58

.

As to burning of buildings other than dwelling houses, see

G.S. 14-59

et seq.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. XI, § 2, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For symposium address on the death penalty in North Carolina, see 8 Campbell L. Rev. 1 (1985).

For article, “Prosecutorial Abuse of Peremptory Challenges in Death Penalty Litigation: Some Constitutional and Ethical Considerations,” see 8 Campbell L. Rev. 71 (1985).

For note, “Arbitrariness and the Death Penalty in an International Context,” see 45 Duke L.J. 611 (1995).

For article, “Innocence Modified,” see 89 N.C. L. Rev. 1083 (2011).

For note, “If At First You Don’t Succeed:
Constitutional Challenges to Second Execution Attempts,”
see 53 Wake Forest L. Rev. 211 (2018).

For article, “Life Without Parole Sentencing in North Carolina,” see 99 N.C.L. Rev. 279 (2021).

§ 3. Charitable and correctional institutions and agencies.

Such charitable, benevolent, penal, and correctional institutions and agencies as the needs of humanity and the public good may require shall be established and operated by the State under such organization and in such manner as the General Assembly may prescribe.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

This section is new with the Constitution of 1970.

§ 4. Welfare policy; board of public welfare.

Beneficent provision for the poor, the unfortunate, and the orphan is one of the first duties of a civilized and a Christian state. Therefore the General Assembly shall provide for and define the duties of a board of public welfare.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. XI, § 7, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Obligation of North Carolina Municipalities and Hospital Authorities to Provide Uncompensated Hospital Care to the Medically Indigent,” see 20 Wake Forest L. Rev. 317 (1984).

For article discussing the rise and decline of North Carolina Abortion Fund, see 22 Campbell L. Rev. 119 (1999).